Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 27.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201023-1829
Organ and tissue
donations; denial of recovery; written report required.

If
the coroner denies recovery of an organ or tissue, the coroner shall include in a written report the reasons such
recovery was denied and provide the report within ten days to the federally
designated organ procurement organization for Nebraska.

Laws 2008, LB246, § 5;

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 27.